Missouri, session 2026, HB1968.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 337.035, 337.330, 337.525, 337.630, and 337.730, RSMo, are
repealed and five new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 337.035,
337.330, 337.525, 337.630, and 337.730, to read as follows:
337.035. 1. The committee may refuse to issue any certificate of registration or
authority, permit or license required pursuant to this chapter for one or any combination of
causes stated in subsection 2 of this section. The committee shall notify the applicant in
writing of the reasons for the refusal and shall advise the applicant of the applicant's right to
file a complaint with the administrative hearing commission as provided by chapter 621.
2. The committee may cause a complaint to be filed with the administrative hearing
commission as provided by chapter 621 against any holder of any certificate of registration or
authority, permit or license required by this chapter or any person who has failed to renew or
has surrendered the person's certificate of registration or authority, permit or license for any
one or any combination of the following causes:
(1) Use of any controlled substance, as defined in chapter 195, or alcoholic beverage
to an extent that such use impairs a person's ability to perform the work of any profession
licensed or regulated by this chapter;
(2) The person has been finally adjudicated and found guilty, or entered a plea of
guilty or nolo contendere, in a criminal prosecution under the laws of any state, of the United
States, or of any country, for any offense directly related to the duties and responsibilities of
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1968 2
the occupation, as set forth in section 324.012, regardless of whether or not sentence is
imposed;
(3) Use of fraud, deception, misrepresentation or bribery in securing any certificate of
registration or authority, permit or license issued pursuant to this chapter or in obtaining
permission to take any examination given or required pursuant to this chapter;
(4) Obtaining or attempting to obtain any fee, charge, tuition or other compensation
by fraud, deception or misrepresentation;
(5) Incompetency, misconduct, gross negligence, fraud, misrepresentation or
dishonesty in the performance of the functions or duties of any profession licensed or
regulated by this chapter;
(6) Violation of, or assisting or enabling any person to violate, any provision of this
chapter, or of any lawful rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this chapter;
(7) Impersonation of any person holding a certificate of registration or authority,
permit or license or allowing any person to use his or her certificate of registration or
authority, permit, license or diploma from any school;
(8) Disciplinary action against the holder of a license or other right to practice any
profession regulated by this chapter granted by another state, territory, federal agency or
country upon grounds for which revocation or suspension is authorized in this state;
(9) A person is finally adjudged insane or incapacitated by a court of competent
jurisdiction;
(10) Assisting or enabling any person to practice or offer to practice any profession
licensed or regulated by this chapter who is not registered and currently eligible to practice as
provided this chapter;
(11) Issuance of a certificate of registration or authority, permit or license based upon
a material mistake of fact;
(12) Failure to display a valid certificate or license if so required by this chapter or
any rule promulgated pursuant to this chapter;
(13) Violation of any professional trust or confidence;
(14) Use of any advertisement or solicitation which is false, misleading or deceptive
to the general public or persons to whom the advertisement or solicitation is primarily
directed;
(15) Being guilty of unethical conduct as defined in "Ethical Rules of Conduct" as
adopted by the committee and filed with the secretary of state;
(16) Engaging in conversion therapy with a minor. For purposes of this
subdivision, the term "conversion therapy" means any practices or treatments that seek
to change an individual's sexual orientation or gender identity, including efforts to
change behaviors or gender expressions or to eliminate or reduce sexual or romantic

HB 1968 3
attractions or feelings toward individuals of the same gender. "Conversion therapy"
shall not include counseling that provides assistance to a person undergoing gender
transition or counseling that provides acceptance, support, and understanding of a
person or facilitates a person's coping, social support, and identity exploration and
development, including sexual-orientation-neutral interventions to prevent or address
unlawful conduct or unsafe sexual practices, as long as such counseling does not seek to
change an individual's sexual orientation or gender identity.
3. After the filing of such complaint, the proceedings shall be conducted in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 621. Upon a finding by the administrative hearing
commission that the grounds, provided in subsection 2 of this section, for disciplinary action
are met, the committee may, singly or in combination, censure or place the person named in
the complaint on probation on such terms and conditions as the department deems appropriate
for a period not to exceed five years, or may suspend, for a period not to exceed three years,
or revoke the license, certificate, or permit.
4. An interested third party may file a complaint or appear or present evidence
relative to such complaint or another complaint filed pursuant to this section. For purposes of
this section, an interested third party includes a parent or guardian of a person who received
treatment by a psychologist or any person who is related within the second degree of
consanguinity or affinity and who is financially responsible for the payment of such
treatment.
337.330. 1. The committee may refuse to issue any license required under this
chapter for one or any combination of causes stated in subsection 2 of this section. The
committee shall notify the applicant in writing of the reasons for the refusal and shall advise
the applicant of the applicant's right to file a complaint with the administrative hearing
commission as provided by chapter 621.
2. The committee may cause a complaint to be filed with the administrative hearing
commission, as provided by chapter 621, against any holder of any license required by this
chapter or any person who has failed to renew or has surrendered the person's license for any
one or any combination of the following causes:
(1) Use of any controlled substance, as defined in chapter 195, or alcoholic beverage
to an extent that such use impairs a person's ability to perform the work of any profession
licensed or regulated by this chapter;
(2) The person has been finally adjudicated and found guilty, or entered a plea of
guilty or nolo contendere, in a criminal prosecution under the laws of any state, of the United
States, or of any country for any offense directly related to the duties and responsibilities of
the occupation, as set forth in section 324.012, regardless of whether or not sentence is
imposed;

HB 1968 4
(3) Use of fraud, deception, misrepresentation or bribery in securing any permit or
license issued under this chapter or in obtaining permission to take any examination given or
required under sections 337.300 to 337.345;
(4) Obtaining or attempting to obtain any fee, charge, tuition, or other compensation
by fraud, deception or misrepresentation;
(5) Incompetency, misconduct, gross negligence, fraud, misrepresentation, or
dishonesty in the performance of the functions or duties of any profession licensed by
sections 337.300 to 337.345;
(6) Violation of, or assisting or enabling any person to violate, any provision of
sections 337.300 to 337.345, or of any lawful rule adopted thereunder;
(7) Impersonation of any person holding a certificate of registration or authority,
permit or license or allowing any person to use his or her certificate of registration or
authority, permit, license, or diploma from any school;
(8) Disciplinary action against the holder of a license or other right to practice any
profession regulated by sections 337.300 to 337.345 granted by another state, territory,
federal agency, or country upon grounds for which revocation or suspension is authorized in
this state;
(9) A person is finally adjudged insane or incapacitated by a court of competent
jurisdiction;
(10) Assisting or enabling any person to practice or offer to practice any profession
licensed or regulated by sections 337.300 to 337.345 who is not registered and currently
eligible to practice as provided in sections 337.300 to 337.345;
(11) Issuance of a certificate of registration or authority, permit, or license based upon
a material mistake of fact;
(12) Failure to display a valid certificate or license if so required by sections 337.300
to 337.345 or any rule promulgated thereunder;
(13) Violation of any professional trust or confidence;
(14) Use of any advertisement or solicitation which is false, misleading, or deceptive
to the general public or persons to whom the advertisement or solicitation is primarily
directed;
(15) Being guilty of unethical conduct as defined in the code of conduct as adopted
by the committee and filed with the secretary of state;
(16) Engaging in conversion therapy with a minor. For purposes of this
subdivision, the term "conversion therapy" means any practices or treatments that seek
to change an individual's sexual orientation or gender identity, including efforts to
change behaviors or gender expressions or to eliminate or reduce sexual or romantic
attractions or feelings toward individuals of the same gender. "Conversion therapy"

HB 1968 5
shall not include counseling that provides assistance to a person undergoing gender
transition or counseling that provides acceptance, support, and understanding of a
person or facilitates a person's coping, social support, and identity exploration and
development, including sexual-orientation-neutral interventions to prevent or address
unlawful conduct or unsafe sexual practices, as long as such counseling does not seek to
change an individual's sexual orientation or gender identity.
3. After the filing of such complaint, the proceedings shall be conducted in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 621. Upon a finding by the administrative hearing
commission that the grounds, provided in subsection 2 of this section, for disciplinary action
are met, the committee may, singly or in combination, censure or place the person named in
the complaint on probation on such terms and conditions as the department deems appropriate
for a period not to exceed five years, or may suspend, for a period not to exceed three years,
or revoke the license, certificate, or permit.
337.525. 1. The committee may refuse to issue or renew any license required by the
provisions of sections 337.500 to 337.540 for one or any combination of causes stated in
subsection 2 of this section. The committee shall notify the applicant in writing of the reasons
for the refusal and shall advise the applicant of his or her right to file a complaint with the
administrative hearing commission as provided by chapter 621.
2. The committee may cause a complaint to be filed with the administrative hearing
commission as provided by chapter 621 against any holder of any license required by sections
337.500 to 337.540 or any person who has failed to renew or has surrendered his license for
any one or any combination of the following causes:
(1) Use of any controlled substance, as defined in chapter 195, or alcoholic beverage
to an extent that such use impairs a person's ability to engage in the occupation of
professional counselor;
(2) The person has been finally adjudicated and found guilty, or entered a plea of
guilty or nolo contendere, in a criminal prosecution under the laws of any state, of the United
States, or of any country, for any offense directly related to the duties and responsibilities of
the occupation, as set forth in section 324.012, regardless of whether or not sentence is
imposed;
(3) Use of fraud, deception, misrepresentation or bribery in securing any license
issued pursuant to the provisions of sections 337.500 to 337.540 or in obtaining permission to
take any examination given or required pursuant to the provisions of sections 337.500 to
337.540;
(4) Obtaining or attempting to obtain any fee, charge, tuition or other compensation
by fraud, deception or misrepresentation;

HB 1968 6
(5) Incompetency, misconduct, fraud, misrepresentation or dishonesty in the
performance of the functions or duties of a professional counselor;
(6) Violation of, or assisting or enabling any person to violate, any provision of
sections 337.500 to 337.540, or of any lawful rule or regulation adopted pursuant to sections
337.500 to 337.540;
(7) Impersonation of any person holding a license or allowing any person to use his or
her license or diploma from any school;
(8) Revocation or suspension of a license or other right to practice counseling granted
by another state, territory, federal agency or country upon grounds for which revocation or
suspension is authorized in this state;
(9) A person is finally adjudged incapacitated by a court of competent jurisdiction;
(10) Assisting or enabling any person to practice or offer to practice professional
counseling who is not licensed and currently eligible to practice under the provisions of
sections 337.500 to 337.540;
(11) Issuance of a license based upon a material mistake of fact;
(12) Failure to display a valid license if so required by sections 337.500 to 337.540 or
any rule promulgated hereunder;
(13) Violation of any professional trust or confidence;
(14) Use of any advertisement or solicitation which is false, misleading or deceptive
to the general public or persons to whom the advertisement or solicitation is primarily
directed;
(15) Being guilty of unethical conduct as defined in the ethical standards for
counselors adopted by the division and filed with the secretary of state;
(16) Engaging in conversion therapy with a minor. For purposes of this
subdivision, the term "conversion therapy" means any practices or treatments that seek
to change an individual's sexual orientation or gender identity, including efforts to
change behaviors or gender expressions or to eliminate or reduce sexual or romantic
attractions or feelings toward individuals of the same gender. "Conversion therapy"
shall not include counseling that provides assistance to a person undergoing gender
transition or counseling that provides acceptance, support, and understanding of a
person or facilitates a person's coping, social support, and identity exploration and
development, including sexual-orientation-neutral interventions to prevent or address
unlawful conduct or unsafe sexual practices, as long as such counseling does not seek to
change an individual's sexual orientation or gender identity.
3. Any person, organization, association or corporation who reports or provides
information to the committee pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and who does so in
good faith shall not be subject to an action for civil damages as a result thereof.

HB 1968 7
4. After the filing of such complaint, the proceedings shall be conducted in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 621. Upon a finding by the administrative hearing
commission that the grounds, provided in subsection 2 of this section, for disciplinary action
are met, the committee may censure or place the person named in the complaint on probation
on such terms and conditions as the committee deems appropriate for a period not to exceed
five years, or may suspend, for a period not to exceed three years, or revoke the license.
337.630. 1. The committee may refuse to issue or renew any license required by the
provisions of sections 337.600 to 337.689 for one or any combination of causes stated in
subsection 2 of this section. The committee shall notify the applicant in writing of the reasons
for the refusal and shall advise the applicant of the applicant's right to file a complaint with
the administrative hearing commission as provided by chapter 621.
2. The committee may cause a complaint to be filed with the administrative hearing
commission as provided by chapter 621 against any holder of any license required by sections
337.600 to 337.689 or any person who has failed to renew or has surrendered the person's
license for any one or any combination of the following causes:
(1) Use of any controlled substance, as defined in chapter 195, or alcoholic beverage
to an extent that such use impairs a person's ability to engage in the occupation of social work
licensed under this chapter; except that the fact that a person has undergone treatment for past
substance or alcohol abuse and/or has participated in a recovery program, shall not by itself
be cause for refusal to issue or renew a license;
(2) The person has been finally adjudicated and found guilty, or entered a plea of
guilty or nolo contendere, in a criminal prosecution pursuant to the laws of any state, of the
United States, or of any country, for any offense directly related to the duties and
responsibilities of the occupation, as set forth in section 324.012, regardless of whether or not
sentence is imposed;
(3) Use of fraud, deception, misrepresentation or bribery in securing any license
issued pursuant to the provisions of sections 337.600 to 337.689 or in obtaining permission to
take any examination given or required pursuant to the provisions of sections 337.600 to
337.689;
(4) Obtaining or attempting to obtain any fee, charge, tuition or other compensation
by fraud, deception or misrepresentation;
(5) Incompetency, misconduct, fraud, misrepresentation or dishonesty in the
performance of the functions or duties of a social worker licensed pursuant to this chapter;
(6) Violation of, or assisting or enabling any person to violate, any provision of
sections 337.600 to 337.689, or of any lawful rule or regulation adopted pursuant to sections
337.600 to 337.689;

HB 1968 8
(7) Impersonation of any person holding a license or allowing any person to use the
person's license or diploma from any school;
(8) Revocation or suspension of a license or other right to practice social work
licensed pursuant to this chapter granted by another state, territory, federal agency or country
upon grounds for which revocation or suspension is authorized in this state;
(9) Final adjudication as incapacitated by a court of competent jurisdiction;
(10) Assisting or enabling any person to practice or offer to practice social work
licensed pursuant to this chapter who is not licensed and currently eligible to practice
pursuant to the provisions of sections 337.600 to 337.689;
(11) Obtaining a license based upon a material mistake of fact;
(12) Failure to display a valid license if so required by sections 337.600 to 337.689 or
any rule promulgated hereunder;
(13) Violation of any professional trust or confidence;
(14) Use of any advertisement or solicitation which is false, misleading or deceptive
to the general public or persons to whom the advertisement or solicitation is primarily
directed;
(15) Being guilty of unethical conduct as defined in the ethical standards for clinical
social workers adopted by the committee by rule and filed with the secretary of state;
(16) Engaging in conversion therapy with a minor. For purposes of this
subdivision, the term "conversion therapy" means any practices or treatments that seek
to change an individual's sexual orientation or gender identity, including efforts to
change behaviors or gender expressions or to eliminate or reduce sexual or romantic
attractions or feelings toward individuals of the same gender. "Conversion therapy"
shall not include counseling that provides assistance to a person undergoing gender
transition or counseling that provides acceptance, support, and understanding of a
person or facilitates a person's coping, social support, and identity exploration and
development, including sexual-orientation-neutral interventions to prevent or address
unlawful conduct or unsafe sexual practices, as long as such counseling does not seek to
change an individual's sexual orientation or gender identity.
3. Any person, organization, association or corporation who reports or provides
information to the committee pursuant to the provisions of sections 337.600 to 337.689 and
who does so in good faith shall not be subject to an action for civil damages as a result
thereof.
4. After the filing of such complaint, the proceedings shall be conducted in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 621. Upon a finding by the administrative hearing
commission that the grounds, provided in subsection 2 of this section, for disciplinary action
are met, the committee may censure or place the person named in the complaint on probation

HB 1968 9
on such terms and conditions as the committee deems appropriate for a period not to exceed
five years, or may suspend, for a period not to exceed three years, or revoke the license.
337.730. 1. The committee may refuse to issue or renew any license required by the
provisions of sections 337.700 to 337.739 for one or any combination of causes stated in
subsection 2 of this section. The committee shall notify the applicant in writing of the reasons
for the refusal and shall advise the applicant of the applicant's right to file a complaint with
the administrative hearing commission as provided by chapter 621.
2. The committee may cause a complaint to be filed with the administrative hearing
commission as provided by chapter 621 against any holder of any license required by sections
337.700 to 337.739 or any person who has failed to renew or has surrendered the person's
license for any one or any combination of the following causes:
(1) Use of any controlled substance, as defined in chapter 195, or alcoholic beverage
to an extent that such use impairs a person's ability to engage in the occupation of marital and
family therapist; except the fact that a person has undergone treatment for past substance or
alcohol abuse or has participated in a recovery program, shall not by itself be cause for refusal
to issue or renew a license;
(2) The person has been finally adjudicated and found guilty, or entered a plea of
guilty in a criminal prosecution under the laws of any state, of the United States, or of any
country, for any offense directly related to the duties and responsibilities of the occupation, as
set forth in section 324.012, regardless of whether or not sentence is imposed;
(3) Use of fraud, deception, misrepresentation or bribery in securing any license
issued pursuant to the provisions of sections 337.700 to 337.739 or in obtaining permission to
take any examination given or required pursuant to the provisions of sections 337.700 to
337.739;
(4) Obtaining or attempting to obtain any fee, charge, tuition or other compensation
by fraud, deception or misrepresentation;
(5) Incompetency, misconduct, fraud, misrepresentation or dishonesty in the
performance of the functions or duties of a marital and family therapist;
(6) Violation of, or assisting or enabling any person to violate, any provision of
sections 337.700 to 337.739 or of any lawful rule or regulation adopted pursuant to sections
337.700 to 337.739;
(7) Impersonation of any person holding a license or allowing any person to use the
person's license or diploma from any school;
(8) Revocation or suspension of a license or other right to practice marital and family
therapy granted by another state, territory, federal agency or country upon grounds for which
revocation or suspension is authorized in this state;
(9) Final adjudication as incapacitated by a court of competent jurisdiction;

HB 1968 10
(10) Assisting or enabling any person to practice or offer to practice marital and
family therapy who is not licensed and is not currently eligible to practice under the
provisions of sections 337.700 to 337.739;
(11) Obtaining a license based upon a material mistake of fact;
(12) Failure to display a valid license if so required by sections 337.700 to 337.739 or
any rule promulgated hereunder;
(13) Violation of any professional trust or confidence;
(14) Use of any advertisement or solicitation which is false, misleading or deceptive
to the general public or persons to whom the advertisement or solicitation is primarily
directed;
(15) Being guilty of unethical conduct as defined in the ethical standards for marital
and family therapists adopted by the committee by rule and filed with the secretary of state;
(16) Engaging in conversion therapy with a minor. For purposes of this
subdivision, the term "conversion therapy" means any practices or treatments that seek
to change an individual's sexual orientation or gender identity, including efforts to
change behaviors or gender expressions or to eliminate or reduce sexual or romantic
attractions or feelings toward individuals of the same gender. "Conversion therapy"
shall not include counseling that provides assistance to a person undergoing gender
transition or counseling that provides acceptance, support, and understanding of a
person or facilitates a person's coping, social support, and identity exploration and
development, including sexual-orientation-neutral interventions to prevent or address
unlawful conduct or unsafe sexual practices, as long as such counseling does not seek to
change an individual's sexual orientation or gender identity.
3. Any person, organization, association or corporation who reports or provides
information to the committee under sections 337.700 to 337.739 and who does so in good
faith shall not be subject to an action for civil damages as a result thereof.
4. After filing of such complaint, the proceedings shall be conducted in accordance
with the provisions of chapter 621. Upon a finding by the administrative hearing commission
that the grounds provided in subsection 2 of this section for disciplinary action are met, the
division may censure or place the person named in the complaint on probation on such terms
and conditions as the committee deems appropriate for a period not to exceed five years, or
may suspend for a period not to exceed three years, or revoke the license.
✔